Maryland, session 2026, SB0901.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
9–102.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0901*

SENATE BILL 901
(2) “ACCESSIBLE FORMAT” MEANS BRAILLE, LARGE PRINT, AUDIO,
OR DIGITAL TEXT THAT IS USED BY BLIND OR VISUALLY IMPAIRED INDIVIDUALS OR
INDIVIDUALS WITH A PRINT DISABILITY.
(3) “PRINT DISABILITY” MEANS A CONDITION THAT PREVENTS OR
INHIBITS AN INDIVIDUAL FROM READING, HOLDING, OR PROCESSING STANDARD
PRINTED MATERIALS IN THE ORIGINAL FORMAT.
(B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE STATE
BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE LOCAL BOARDS, SHALL SELECT AND CERTIFY
A TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM FOR ABSENTEE VOTING BY ELIGIBLE VOTERS WHO
HAVE ATTESTED TO HAVING A PRINT DISABILITY THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM SELECTED AND CERTIFIED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE USED IN ALL COUNTIES.
(3) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ACQUIRE THE TELEPHONE VOTING
SYSTEM SELECTED AND CERTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) THE STATE BOARD MAY NOT CERTIFY A TELEPHONE VOTING
SYSTEM UNLESS THE STATE BOARD DETERMINES THAT THE VOTING SYSTEM WILL:
(I) PROTECT THE SECRECY OF THE BALLOT;
(II) PROTECT THE SECURITY OF THE VOTING PROCESS;
(III) RECORD ALL VOTES ACCURATELY;
(IV) PROTECT ALL OTHER RIGHTS OF VOTERS AND CANDIDATES;
(V) BE CAPABLE OF CREATING A PAPER RECORD OF ALL VOTES
CAST SO THAT AN AUDIT TRAIL IS AVAILABLE IN THE EVENT OF A RECOUNT,
INCLUDING A MANUAL RECOUNT;
(VI) SECURELY AUTHENTICATE THE IDENTITY OF THE VOTER
BEFORE ALLOWING A BALLOT TO BE CAST, INCLUDING THROUGH THE USE OF
PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION NUMBERS, VOICEPRINT, OR OTHER TECHNOLOGY;
(VII) PROMPT A VOTER TO SELECT FROM THE OPTIONS FOR EACH
CONTEST OR QUESTION, ONE CONTEST OR QUESTION AT A TIME, IN THE SAME
ORDER AS PRINTED ON THE PRINTED BALLOT, AND CONFIRM THE VOTER’S VOTE
FOR EACH CONTEST OR QUESTION ON THE BALLOT;

SENATE BILL 901 3
(VIII) ENCRYPT THE RESULTS OF THE VOTED BALLOT ON
CONFIRMATION BY THE VOTER THAT THE VOTER HAS FINISHED VOTING;
(IX) STORE VOTED BALLOTS IN AN AIR–GAPPED, REMEMBERING,
NON–INTERNET CONNECTED SYSTEM;
(X) PRINT VOTED BALLOTS INTO A SCANNABLE PAPER BALLOT
OR BE TRANSCRIBED IN THE SAME MANNER AS ABSENTEE BALLOTS PROVIDED BY
THE INTERNET;
(XI) BE ACCESSIBLE THROUGH A TOLL–FREE NUMBER; AND
(XII) PROHIBIT A VOTER FROM CASTING MORE THAN ONE
BALLOT.
(2) THE STATE BOARD MAY NOT CERTIFY A TELEPHONE VOTING
SYSTEM UNLESS:
(I) THE TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM HAS BEEN:
1. EXAMINED BY AN INDEPENDENT TESTING
LABORATORY THAT IS APPROVED BY THE U.S. ELECTION ASSISTANCE
COMMISSION; AND
2. SHOWN BY THE TESTING LABORATORY TO MEET THE
PERFORMANCE AND TEST STANDARDS FOR VOTING SYSTEMS ESTABLISHED BY THE
FEDERAL ELECTION COMMISSION OR THE U.S. ELECTION ASSISTANCE
COMMISSION; AND
(II) THE PUBLIC INTEREST WILL BE SERVED BY THE
CERTIFICATION OF THE VOTING SYSTEM.
(D) A VOTE CAST THROUGH THE TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM SHALL BE
CANVASSED WITH OTHER ABSENTEE BALLOTS.
(E) (1) A VOTER IS ELIGIBLE TO USE THE TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM IF
THE VOTER SUBMITS A FORM TO THE STATE BOARD ATTESTING THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS A PRINT DISABILITY.
(2) A VOTER WHO SUBMITS A PROPER FORM UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE PLACED ON THE TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM LIST
BY THE STATE BOARD.

SENATE BILL 901
(F) (1) NOT LESS THAN 75 DAYS BEFORE THE DAY ON WHICH A LOCAL
BOARD BEGINS TO SEND ABSENTEE BALLOTS TO VOTERS, THE STATE BOARD SHALL
SEND A WRITTEN COMMUNICATION, USING AN ACCESSIBLE FORMAT CHOSEN BY THE
VOTER, TO EACH VOTER WHO IS ON THE TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM LIST.
(2) THE COMMUNICATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) CONFIRMATION THAT THE VOTER IS ON THE TELEPHONE
VOTING SYSTEM LIST;
(II) THE TOLL–FREE TELEPHONE NUMBER THAT THE VOTER
MAY USE TO ACCESS THE TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM;
(III) THE DATES DURING WHICH THE VOTER MAY ACCESS THE
TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM;
(IV) CREDENTIALS TO AUTHENTICATE THE VOTER’S IDENTITY;
(V) INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO USE THE TELEPHONE VOTING
SYSTEM; AND
(VI) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR VOTER ASSISTANCE.
(G) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A VOTER
EDUCATION CAMPAIGN TO PROVIDE INFORMATION TO THE PUBLIC, AND
SPECIFICALLY VOTERS WITH A PRINT DISABILITY, OF THE AVAILABILITY OF THE
TELEPHONE VOTING SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2028, the State Board of Elections shall report to the Senate Education, Energy, and the
Environment Committee and the House Government, Labor, and Elections Committee, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
(1) the telephone voting system selected and certified by the State Board
in accordance with § 9–102.1 of the Election Law Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this
Act;
(2) the status and timeline for fully implementing the telephone voting
system;
(3) the cost of acquiring, administering, and implementing the telephone
voting system;

SENATE BILL 901 5
(4) the status of the voter education campaign required under § 9–102.1(g)
of the Election Law Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(5) projections on the number of voters who may be eligible to use the
telephone voting system.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.